Hawaii statutes.
§199-1 Board of land and natural resources,
powers and duties. The board of land and natural resources shall establish
within the department of land and natural resources a conservation and
resources enforcement program relating to the enforcement of title 12, chapters
6D, 6E, and 6K, and rules adopted thereunder, and shall employ or appoint, and
remove, the following persons, subject to chapter 76 and section 78-1, who
shall be provided with suitable badges or insignia of office by the department
of land and natural resources:

(1) An enforcement chief of the department of land
and natural resources, who shall be the head of the conservation and resources
enforcement program and shall have charge, direction, and control, subject to
the direction and control of the board, of all matters relating to the
enforcement of title 12, chapters 6D, 6E, and 6K, and rules adopted thereunder
and such other matters as the board may from time to time direct. The
enforcement chief shall be an administrator experienced in conservation and
resources law enforcement and management; and

(2) Personnel and enforcement officers of the
conservation and resources enforcement program, including but not limited to
enforcement officers on a voluntary basis and without pay. [L 1978, c 171, pt
of §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2004, c 142, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next